<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881122-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-22-88.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 225 / Tuesday, November 22, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Federal Aviation Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">14 CFR Parts 135 and 145</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 25454; Amdt. Nos. 135-29 and 145-21]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">RIN 2120-AC50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Foreign Repair Station Rules</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The purpose of these amendments is to revise the regulationsto accommodate the increasing demand for maintenance and alteration ofU.S.-registered aircraft operated worldwide. These amendments modify therequirements for U.S. certification of a foreign repair station. In addition,a foreign or domestic manufacturer of a product for which it holds a U.S.type certificate and that is certificated by the FAA as a repair stationwill be allowed to return to service a component maintained or alteredby a noncertificated source, subject to specified conditions. Lastly, tobe consistent with the air carrier operating rules, the air taxi/commercialoperator rules are amended to permit the airworthiness release to be signedby a person authorized by a U.S.-certificated foreign repair station. Thisaction is part of a general project underway to review and update all FederalAviation Regulations (FAR) governing repair stations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>December 22, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Mr. Leo Weston, Aircraft MaintenanceDivision (AFS-340), Office of Flight Standards, Federal Aviation Administration,800 Independence Avenue, SW., Washington, DC 20591, telephone (202) 267-8203.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Subpart C, Part 145 of the FAR, Foreign Repair Stations, has its originin Civil Air Regulations (CAR) Part 52 by an amendment adopted in 1949as andSection; 52.38 (14 FR 623; February 11, 1949). The purpose of the amendmentwas to provide for the issuance of foreign repair station certificatesfor facilities located outside the United States where the Administratorfound that ``* * * such agencies are needed for the maintenance, alteration,and repair of United States aircraft operated outside the United States.''The lack of repair agencies authorized to perform work on U.S.-registeredaircraft in certain areas outside the United States at that time resultedin considerable inconvenience to aircraft owners, pilots, and operatorsconducting international flight operations. It was recognized that certificationof foreign agencies, even those not staffed with holders of U.S. airmancertificates, would expedite the maintenance, repair, and return to serviceof U.S. aircraft in those areas where certificated repair stations werenot available. Consistent with the concept that the maintenance was tobe performed on U.S.-registered aircraft in areas outside the United States,the scope of a certificated foreign repair station's authority providedfor in andSection; 52.38 was limited to ``performance of work on aircraftwhich are used in operations conducted in whole or in part outside theUnited States * * *.''CAR Part 52 was revised in 1952 (17 FR 2981; April 5, 1952) with andSection;52.38 becoming andSection; 52.50. When the Civil Air Regulations were recodifiedin 1962, CAR Part 52 became FAR Part 145, and CAR section 52.50 becameFAR sections 145.71 and 145.73 (27 FR 6662; July 13, 1962).On July 1, 1986, the FAA prepared two draft internal action notices whichwere later revised on October 3, 1986. The first addressed foreign repairstation privileges and responsibilities under Part 145 and the eligibilityof replacement parts for return to service on U.S.-registered aircraft.The second draft action notice addressed air carrier privileges and responsibilitiesunder Parts 121 and 135 when using noncertificated sources for parts. Thedraft action notices did not represent new FAA policy.Although it is not regular or required practice for the FAA to solicitcomments on internal guidance material, such as action notices, the originalnotices were broadly circulated to be consistent with the FAA's practiceof seeking constructive input and promoting international cooperation.The FAA received comments from 34 different entities, including severalforeign civil aviation authorities. Several of the commenters were of theopinion that existing rules and practices required substantive change,and that, to be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, arulemaking proceeding was appropriate.In addition, the FAA received petitions from the Air Transport Associationof America (ATA) (Docket No. 25169) and the Regional Airline Association(RAA) (Docket Nos. 25162 and 25163). These petitions request changes tothe FAR to clarify the rules and expand the availability of foreign repairstations and foreign aircraft manufacturers for the maintenance and alterationof U.S.-registered aircraft and components, whether or not such aircraftare used wholly or partly outside the United States. Related parts of thesepetitions have been considered in the preparation of this rule and areconsidered a part hereof. Issues in the petitions not within the scopeof the Notice will be acted upon separately.The civil aviation environment has changed significantly since the foreignrepair station regulations were first adopted in 1949. More foreign-manufacturedaircraft are being flown by U.S. operators, and the need for increasedmaintenance capability for U.S.-registered aircraft from both foreign manufacturersand U.S.-certificated foreign repair stations has dramatically increasedin the past 39 years. This need is reflected by exemptions that have beengranted in recent years related to maintenance and alterations performedby foreign repair stations. Exemptions to andSection;andSection; 145.71 and145.73 have authorized certain U.S.-certificated foreign repair stationsto perform work on foreign-manufactured products to be used on U.S.-registeredaircraft that may not be operated outside the United States. Over 100 exemptionsfrom the operating rules have also been issued to air carriers to permitthem to use other than U.S.-certificated airmen (i.e., to use foreign manufacturersand foreign U.S.-certificated repair stations) to repair and return toservice U.S.-registered aircraft and components under the provisions ofthe air carrier operating rules.Many U.S. air carriers currently use foreign-manufactured aircraft andother aeronautical products. This use is partly a result of multinationalconsortiums and cooperative agreements to manufacture and market domesticand foreign products between U.S. and foreign manufacturers. In recentyears, the type and number of aircraft and aircraft parts manufacturedin foreign countries and used by U.S. operators in the United States haveincreased rapidly.Many U.S. air carriers use foreign-manufactured aircraft and products asthe prime elements of their fleets. United States commuter airlines areheavily dependent upon foreign-manufactured aircraft. Due to the unavailabilityof modern U.S.-manufactured passenger aircraft in the 20-50 seat range,almost all of the aircraft with passenger capacities exceeding 19 seatsused by U.S. commuter airlines are foreign manufactured. Larger foreign-manufacturedaircraft, such as the Airbus, as well as foreign-manufactured engines,are being used increasingly by U.S. air carriers.In addition, many U.S. aircraft manufacturers rely on foreign subcontractorsfor many component parts of their aircraft. Under current regulatory limitations,however, foreign manufacturers (with or without a U.S. foreign repair stationcertificate) have been unable in many situations to repair their products,even to the extent that warranty work has been curtailed.United States operators have expressed a need for expanded access to U.S.-certificatedforeign repair stations for maintenance, alteration, and preventive maintenanceof their aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, appliances, and componentparts because of the increased worldwide demand for maintenance and theincreasing amount of foreign-manufactured equipment being used by U.S.operators. This expanded access can be accomplished by changes to SubpartC, Part 145, that would modify the restrictions on who may apply for U.S.certification as a foreign repair station and the limitations on work thatsuch a repair station can perform.Accordingly, on November 24, 1987, the FAA issued Notice of Proposed Rulemaking(NPRM) No. 87-12 (52 FR 45124; November 24, 1987). The notice proposedto amend Part 145 for certificating foreign repair stations by modifyingthe requirements for determination of need before a foreign repair stationmay be considered for U.S. certification. The notice also proposed modifyingthe limitation on the scope of work that a foreign repair station may performon U.S.-registered aircraft and on aircraft engines, propellers, appliances,and component parts for use on U.S.-registered aircraft. Subject to specifiedconditions, the notice provided that a repair station that is also a U.S.type certificate holder may use a noncertificated facility for maintenance.The notice also proposed amending Part 135 to permit the airworthinessrelease to be signed by a person authorized by a U.S.-certificated foreignrepair station. Comments on the notice were requested from the public tobe received on or before January 25, 1988.Subsequent to the opening of the docket on this notice, on December 21,1987, Congress, in Amendment No. 45 to the Conference Report on the ContinuingResolution H.J. Res. 395 making continuing appropriations for the fiscalyear 1988, stated that the proposed rulemaking on foreign repair stationsraised significant policy, economic, and safety issues that should be carefullyreviewed by the appropriate authorizing committees, and that the FAA shoulddefer final action on the notice of proposed rulemaking until October 1,1988. (133 Cong. Rec. H12799 daily ed. Dec. 21, 1987).The FAA received 3,894 comments on this notice. These comments have beenreviewed and considered by the FAA in the promulgation of this rule. Ofthe 3,894 comments reviewed, 3,808 oppose NPRM No. 87-12 and 79 commentersare in support. No comments specifically oppose the proposed amendmentto Part 135 to permit the airworthiness release to be signed by a personauthorized by a U.S.-certificated foreign repair station, and this amendmentis adopted herein as proposed. Seven commenters did not express a positionon the notice.Of the 3,894 comments received and reviewed by FAA, 1,116 comments regardingforeign repair stations were received by the FAA prior to the issuanceof the notice in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on November 24, 1987. The 1,116 pre-docket commentshave been reviewed and generally oppose the substance of the notice andparallel the comments received in opposition to the notice after the docketopened.A considerable number of comments on the notice were received after thedocket was closed. As of May 16, 1988, all of these late comments werereviewed to ensure that all of the issues raised by those comments havebeen addressed in this rulemaking.Of the comments opposing the notice, most of the commenters are eitherindividual mechanics employed, or persons who have family members employed,by a domestic repair station or airline. The labor unions representingmechanics, the Air Line Pilots Association (ALPA) and the Association ofFlight Attendants (AFA), unanimously oppose the proposal. Other union groupsand organizations, such as the American National Association of LetterCarriers, the Moving Picture Machine Operators, the United Food and CommercialWorkers, and the Aeronautical Repair Station Association (ARSA) also opposethe Notice. American Airlines opposes the proposal as it applies to allforeign repair stations, but supports expanding the scope of the presentregulations to permit foreign manufacturers to support their own products.The Office of the Secretary of State for the State of Oklahoma forwardeda Resolution, adopted by the House of Representatives of the Second Sessionof the 41st Oklahoma Legislature, requesting the FAA to withdraw the proposedrule. By House Resolution No. 139, on February 24, 1988, the House of Representativesof the Eighty-fourth General Assembly, Second Regular Session, of the Stateof Missouri resolved that the Missouri House of Representatives encourageeach member of the Missouri Congressional Delegation to contact the UnitedStates Department of Transportation and any other appropriate Federal Agencyregarding the potential impact on Missouri's economy with any expansionof maintenance authority granted under Part 145 and that the Chief Clerkof the Missouri House of Representatives be instructed to prepare properlytranscribed copies of the resolution for the Governor of Missouri, theMissouri Department of Economic Development and for each member of theMissouri Congressional Delegation for their information and possible action.The Attorney General for the State of Minnesota urged the withdrawal ofthe proposed relaxation of the FAA's rules regarding the use of foreignrepair stations.Of the 79 comments received by FAA on NPRM No. 87-12 supporting the proposalscontained therein, the majority of the comments are from corporate or foreigngovernment entities. Seven foreign civil aviation authorities support thenotice, as do several foreign airlines, foreign manufacturers, and foreignrepair stations, as well as their representative associations. SeveralU.S. airlines support the notice, as do their associations. Several U.S.manufacturers and associations support the proposal, including Pratt andamp;Whitney, General Electric, Fokker Aircraft of USA, Incorporated, MBB ofAmerica, Inc., Aerospace Industries Association (AIA), and General AviationManufacturers Association (GAMA).<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments</ITAG>The comments on this notice received by the FAA address 15 separate issues.These are discussed below.Use of a Noncertificated Facility Subject to Specified ConditionsA number of commenters express concern and some misunderstanding with theproposed amendment to andSection; 145.47 by adding a new paragraph (andSection;145.47(c)). The new paragraph would permit a domestic or foreign manufacturerholding a U.S. type certificate and a U.S. repair station certificate tohave maintenance and alteration work performed on certain components bya noncertificated source under certain specified conditions.In proposing the change to andSection; 145.47, it was the FAA's intent topermit a type certificate holder holding the U.S. type certificate fora product it manufactures or manufactured to contract for maintenance andalterations of a component of that product with a noncertificated originalcomponent manufacturer (or licensee), provided such type certificate holderis also a U.S.-certificated repair station. This change would permit theoriginal component manufacturer (or licensee) to perform maintenance onor alteration of a component of the original type certificated productit manufactures for the type certificate holder.The type certificated product (i.e., aircraft, aircraft engine, propeller,or appliance) has been determined by the FAA to be of proper design, material,specification, construction, and performance for safe operations, and tohave met minimum FAA standards, rules, and regulations. Permitting thetype certificate holder, that is also a U.S.-certificated repair station,to maintain the component or to contract for its maintenance or alteration,will permit that foreign or domestic type certificate holder to supportits product (including warranty work), regardless of where the componentwas manufactured. To use a noncertificated facility for maintenance, atype certificate holder must not only hold the type certificate for theproduct, including components thereof, but must also be a functioning U.S.-certificatedrepair station. Under all circumstances, the type certificate holder'srepair station must be under its control. Further, the noncertificatedsubcontractor must have produced the original component under the typecertificate.Before a noncertificated source (original component manufacturer or licensee)may be used by the type certificate holder to repair the component, thetype certificate holder must show the FAA that the original component manufactureror its licensee has all of the necessary data, facilities, materials, andqualified personnel to accomplish the work. In addition, the componentwould be returned to service by the type certificate holder in accordancewith a quality control system for maintenance that (1) Recognizes the creditgiven to the quality control system that the manufacturer has in placefor the type certificated product as well as the necessary differencesbetween the manufacturing and maintenance processes; (2) is approved bythe FAA; and (3) is included in the operations specifications and inspectionprocedures manual of the type certificate holder's repair station.The type certificate holder, that is also a certificated repair station,is responsible for the airworthiness of the repaired component: (1) Byensuring that the maintenance quality control system established for thecomponent was followed in accordance with the procedures in its repairstation's inspection procedures manual; and (2) by ensuring that the maintenanceor repair of the component was properly documented. This procedure forusing noncertificated sources is different from that permitted under currentrules (andSection; 145.47(b)), though under both andSection; 145.47(b) andthe new andSection; 145.47(c) the repair station must have the system capabilityto determine the airworthiness of certain articles or processes. The differencebetween the two paragraphs is that the quality control system and proceduresof the type certificate holder to control a newly manufactured componentfrom the component manufacturer can be modified by the type certificateholder's repair station to a quality control system for maintenance. Aftera component is repaired by the component manufacturer, the component willgo through the type certificate holder's repair station maintenance qualitycontrol system. The type certificate holder's repair station will inspectsuch a component in accordance with its inspection procedures manual toensure that, before the component is placed in stock for use in an aircraftor part thereof, it is in a good state of preservation and is free fromapparent defects or malfunctions.Under the existing rules (andSection; 145.47(b)), a repair station, if authorizedby the FAA, can only contract those functions asterisked in Appendix Ato Part 145. The amendment to andSection; 145.47(c) will permit the typecertificate holder to contract for the repair of a component under itsrepair station certificate using the quality control system inspectionas set forth in its inspection procedures manual. Under this amendment,any maintenance functions that are included in the inspection proceduresmanual of the type certificate holder's repair station may be accomplishedunder the quality control system approved for the repair station.In proposing this concept, the FAA recognized the process established andapproved for type certification and manufacture of new products, and establisheda parallel system to include maintenance requirements for a product andto provide an additional means for a repair station to contract out certaincomponents to a noncertificated facility for maintenance. This processis intended to ensure that the repaired component, like the original manufacturedcomponent, is airworthy and meets all requirements for installation onthe type certificated product. This process also recognizes that the originalcomponent manufacturer is a viable source for engineering data, technicalexpertise, and service information. In addition, the repair of the componentwould be accomplished under the auspices of a U.S.-certificated repairstation (the type certificate holder), which has met the requirements underPart 145 for such a facility, and is inspected and approved by the FAA.Twenty-seven commenters supporting the notice recommend that the FAA permita non-type certificated original component manufacturer to carry out maintenanceand repair on its products as a ``noncertificated source'' under very broadconditions. The commenters recommend that the noncertificated componentmanufacturer be permitted to approve a product's return to service withoutquality verification by a type certificate holder and have the authorityfor direct shipment of parts. Commenters also recommend that the UnitedStates accept direct shipment from the component manufacturer if the manufactureris approved and authorized to maintain the product by a national (foreign)airworthiness authority. These recommendations are beyond the intent and purpose of rulemaking ascontained in the notice and will not be considered. However, with respectto the authority contained in the new andSection;145.47(c), when the FAAcertificates a foreign manufacturer (that is a holder of a U.S. type certificate)as a foreign repair station, any relevant approvals given by foreign airworthinessauthorities will continue to be considered. If the noncertificated componentmanufacturer desires to direct ship a repaired component to a user, bypassingthe type certificate holder, this amendment provides for a component manufacturerto become a U.S.-certificated repair station with an appropriate ratingand, thus, be accorded such privileges. Other commenters contend that by adding a new paragraph to andSection;145.47as proposed, a conflict would arise with the existing andSection;145.47(b)in that the proposal would limit the use of outside vendors to essentiallythe original equipment manufacturers and their subcontractors. The commentersalso point out that the proposed new paragraph to be added to andSection;145.47is in conflict with andSection;145.1(c), which specifies that regulationsregarding maintenance performed by manufacturers are covered under Part145, Subpart D, and that andSection;andSection;145.11 through 145.79 do notapply to manufacturers. Accordingly, the commenters contend that any rulesintended to apply to manufacturers should be addressed only in SubpartD, rather than in Subpart B, as proposed. The FAA sees no conflict in andSection;145.47 between existing paragraph(b) and the paragraph proposed for inclusion in that section as new paragraph(c). Furthermore, a manufacturer with a limited rating under Part 145,Subpart D, cannot contract for repair of a component to a noncertificatedfacility and must perform its maintenance and preventive maintenance operationsin accordance with Part 43. Presently, andSection;145.47(b) provides thata repair station, after obtaining approval from the FAA, may contract certainlimited functions of repair to another facility without having, in house,the required equipment and materials for the function. Those job functionsthat can be so contracted to an outside agency are set forth in AppendixA to Part 145. In such an arrangement, the repair station must determinethe airworthiness of the article involved before it is returned to service,unless the contractor is an appropriately rated repair station, in whichcase the part would be returned to service in accordance with the proceduresas authorized in the repair station's inspection procedures manual. Todetermine the airworthiness of the article involved, the repair stationmust not only be appropriately rated to perform the contracted function,but must have the appropriate data, qualified personnel, and inspectioncapabilities to ensure the airworthiness of the article involved. The new paragraph (andSection;145.47(c)) would permit a type certificateholder that is a certificated repair station to subcontract any repairof a component of a type certificated product to the noncertificated componentmanufacturer. Such a type certificate holder would be responsible for theairworthiness of the article involved, as required in current andSection;145.47(b).However, as long as the component is returned to service in accordancewith the FAA-approved quality control system of the type certificate holder'srepair station, the airworthiness of the article involved is effectivelyensured. This process and the scope of permitted maintenance are the basicdifferences between existing andSection;145.47(b) and new andSection;145.47(c).The FAA also disagrees that the amendment to andSection;145.47 is in conflictwith andSection;145.1(c). Section 145.1(c) provides that a manufacturer mayobtain a repair station certificate with a limited rating issued underSubpart D of Part 145 to exercise the privileges of that rating as a ``manufacturer'smaintenance facility'' (MMF) without having to meet the basic requirementsfor a repair station as set forth in Subpart B of Part 145. The amendment,however, requires the type certificate holder to obtain a rating as a repairstation and to meet all of the requirements for a certificated repair stationas set forth in Subpart B or C of Part 145. A commenter also recommends that the proposal to add a new paragraph (c)to andSection;145.47 be withdrawn and that the FAA amend andSection;43.3(i)relating to persons authorized to perform maintenance, preventive maintenance,rebuilding, and alterations. The commenter recommends that the word ``maintain''be added to that paragraph to allow a manufacturer holding a type certificateand its subcontractors to perform maintenance, in addition to rebuildingand alterations. The FAA disagrees with this recommendation. Such an amendment would notestablish a parallel maintenance quality control system_as would be accomplishedby adding a new paragraph to andSection;145.47_but would permit a manufacturer'smaintenance facility to perform maintenance on a component without showingmaintenance capabilities required under Subpart B of Part 145. Further,as foreign manufacturers do not hold production approvals, this suggestionwould exclude such foreign manufacturers. Several commenters express the concern that, as proposed, andSection;145.47(c)would require a component manufacturer's noncertificated facility thatrepairs a component for a type certificate holder to send the repairedcomponent part ``through'' the type certificate holder for quality verification.The commenters point out that such a physical transfer of the repairedcomponent back to the type certificate holder's repair station would bepointless, cause delay, and increase expense. The commenters further maintainthat only the manufacturers of the component have the specialized testequipment for a full specification check. The FAA disagrees that it would be unnecessarily burdensome for componentsrepaired by a noncertificated contractor, as defined in new andSection;145.47(c),to be routed physically through the type certificate holder's repair stationfacility. This inspection is essential if such a component manufacturerremains noncertificated. If the component manufacturer were certificatedby the United States as a repair station, the requirement to route thecomponent through the type certificate holder would not be necessary, oreven appropriate assuming the component manufacturer is properly rated,and the component manufacturer could direct ship a repaired component.Important safety objectives can only be satisfied if the individual componentsare returned to service by a certificated repair station in accordancewith the quality control system of the type certificate holder's repairstation, as approved by the Administrator and set forth in the operationsspecifications and inspection procedures manual of the type certificateholder's repair station. The FAA, in adopting the concept as proposed inandSection;145.47 for a new paragraph (c), has clarified this intent in thewording of the final rule. Other commenters referring to the proposed new paragraph, andSection;145.47(c)(1),express concern that there may be a potential ambiguity concerning whetheror not the type certificate holder can use the privileges granted by thissection if the product is no longer in production. They also suggest thatandSection;145.47(c)(1) be changed to ``the product'' as opposed to ``a product.''The FAA agrees with both of these suggestions and in andSection;145.47(c)(1),as adopted, has eliminated any question as to whether or not a certificateholder that still holds the type certificate for the product can use theprivilege granted if the product is no longer in production. Other commenters express concern that the new authority in andSection;145.47(c)for holders of repair station certificates, that are also holders of U.S.type certificates, might affect the current authority of all Subpart Band Subpart C repair stations to contract with noncertificated agenciesas currently set forth in Appendix A to Part 145. As stated above, it is the FAA's intent that the authority in new paragraphandSection;145.47(c) is in addition to the existing contracting authorityin andSection;145.47(b), and andSection;145.47(b) authority is not affectedby this amendment. A commenter questions whether or not the proposed amendment to andSection;145.47benefiting original equipment manufacturers is justified. In the commenter'sopinion, the proposed change to andSection;145.47 would extend the abilityto use noncertificated sources beyond warranty work revisions without anapparent safety justification. The commenter contends that the proposedamendment may be based on an FAA assumption that the manufacturing processand the repair process involve basically the same engineering concepts,whereas the manufacturing process and the repair process utilize differentanalyses. The FAA agrees that the processes of manufacturing a single product lineand of repairing the product do not necessarily involve the same knowledgeor perspective. A manufacturer's quality control system and a maintenancequality control system may not be the same, but similarities between thesetwo processes do exist and can be recognized. The amendment takes advantageof the process already established and approved for type certificationand manufacture of new products and establishes a parallel maintenanceconcept. This maintenance process for the repair station of the type certificateholder would explicitly be set forth in its repair station's operationsspecifications and inspection procedures manual as approved by the Administrator.A component of the type certificated product repaired by the componentmanufacturer would only be returned to service if the type certificateholder's repair station ensures that the component has been returned toservice in accordance with the repair station's maintenance proceduresand approved quality control system. Concern is also expressed that the proposal to add a new paragraph (c)to andSection;145.47 would permit and encourage a ``paper transaction'' betweenthe type certificate holder and an associated repair station to createa minimal corporate relationship with a type certificate holder. Underthe proposal, the work done by the repair station of the manufacturer typecertificate holder would be under the quality control system of the typecertificate holder. This will be covered in each repair station's operationsspecifications and inspections procedures manual for each type certificateholder's repair station that undertakes to exercise the authority undernew andSection;145.47(c). Commenters contend that there is no assurance that the noncertificatedlicensee of a noncertificated component manufacturer would have any repaircompetence, as no requirements are set forth that the licensee establishany corporate relationship or have any repair insight into the componentmanufacturer's design concept. The FAA's intent is to permit a licensee of a component manufacturer thatactually manufactures the component to also do repair work, if that licenseeis approved in the same manner as the original component manufacturer inaccordance with the FAA-approved operations specifications and inspectionprocedures manual of the type certificate holder's repair station. The proposal for amendment of andSection;145.47 as contained in the noticehas been modified in accordance with the discussion above. ``Need'' for Foreign Repair Stations Those commenters opposing modification of the foreign repair station rulesin Part 145, Subpart C, would retain the existing wording in andSection;145.71that a foreign repair station certificate would be issued only if the Administratorfinds that the station is necessary for maintaining or altering U.S.-registeredaircraft outside of the United States. The notice proposed deletion ofthe restriction that such U.S. aircraft be ``outside of the United States.''Of those commenters supporting the Notice in general, the majority favoreddeleting this restriction. The commenters point out that the current regulationis a very restrictive approach to foreign maintenance and repairs and isbased on factors increasingly out of touch with the international characterof modern aviation. They emphasize that the current regulation, which waswritten for an aircraft fleet that was all U.S. manufactured and only occasionallyoperated overseas, is inappropriate in today's multinational aviation marketsand industries.Twenty-one commenters supporting the notice recommend that the requiredstatement of need be eliminated from andSection; 145.71 or, if retained,the word ``necessary'' be defined more precisely. These commenters suggestthat the ``need'' clause would lend itself to an interpretation wherebythe FAA, on grounds unrelated to safety, could determine which repair stationscould be used by U.S.-registered aircraft owners. As pointed out in thenotice, the FAA does not intend to implement the ``need'' clause in suchan inappropriate manner. In developing the proposals contained in the notice, the FAA desired toretain a requirement for need when certifying foreign repair stations.The FAA has stated that U.S. foreign repair station certification shouldnot be used in a manner that has no relationship to the support of U.S.-registeredaircraft or U.S. operators. Further, it is necessary to retain a provisionwhich requires a showing of need to avoid situations that could developwhere certification is requested where no reasonable need to support U.S.-registeredaircraft could be expected to develop. This provision will ensure thatforeign repair stations that would not support U.S.-registered aircraftwould not burden U.S. resources for FAA certification or recertification.As to the recommendation to explain the word ``necessary'' in a more precisemanner, the use of this word in existing andSection; 145.71 has not led tothe difficulties in administration of the regulation that some commenterssuggest. The word ``necessary'' as retained in andSection; 145.71 will notbe used to deny the issuance of foreign repair station certificates tootherwise qualified applicants provided such stations will work on U.S.-registeredaircraft.Scope of Work of Foreign Repair StationsThose commenters opposing modification of the foreign repair station rulesin Part 145, Subpart C, would retain the existing wording in andSection;145.73 that a foreign repair station can work on U.S.-registered aircraftand on aircraft engines, propellers, appliances, and component parts foruse on U.S.-registered aircraft only if such aircraft are used in operationsconducted wholly or partly outside of the United States. The notice proposeddeleting this geographical restriction. All commenters supporting the noticeagree with this deletion. These commenters contend that the geographiclimitation in the scope of work of authorized foreign repair stations intoday's environment creates an unrealistic regulatory situation. For example,if a foreign repair station performed identical maintenance on the identicalcomponents of two identical aircraft of a U.S. air carrier, one aircraftof which operated outside of the United States and the other operated solelydomestically, a literal interpretation of existing andSection; 145.73 wouldresult in a determination that the aircraft operating internationally waslegally maintained while the aircraft operating domestically was not. TheFAA recognized this anomaly in the notice by pointing out that if properlyqualified and certificated by the FAA, a foreign repair station operatingin accordance with FAA requirements and surveillance can provide properand safe maintenance and alteration of U.S.-registered aircraft and theircomponents. This capability does not depend on the aircraft's physicallocation at the time maintenance or alteration is required and accomplished.The amended rule deletes this geographical restriction.Return of Warranted Parts to the Type Certificate HolderRAA and several U.S. commuter air carriers commenting in support of thenotice emphasize the necessity that such operators be given the flexibilityto return warranted aircraft components or unusually troublesome componentsback to the manufacturer, that holds the type certificate, for maintenance.RAA indicates that the commuter industry in the United States currentlyoperates approximately 780 foreign-built aircraft representing about 41percent of the total estimated commuter aircraft in operation in 1987.Of the 18 most commonly flown types of passenger aircraft in regional airlineservice in 1987, 12 were foreign manufactured. Those foreign aircraft togetherconstituted over 65 percent of the total seating capacity of the regionalpassenger industry in 1987.Several commuter/regional airlines state that the proposed amendments inthe notice would greatly facilitate maintenance support of their foreign-buildaircraft by providing more flexibility through increased resources by permittingoperators to reduce inventories of high-value replacement components. Theyalso point out that certificated repair stations in the United States havelong had the opportunity to acquire the tooling, equipment, and trainingto support foreign-manufactured aircraft system components and have largelyfailed to do so.One operator states that it has been operating the German Dornier DO-228aircraft for over 3 years, and during this time has been directly involvedin an attempt to broaden the scope of domestic capabilities for the maintenanceof foreign-built components on its aircraft. This commenter contends thatdue to the small Dornier fleet size in the United States, there has beenresistence by domestic repair stations to purchase the necessary test equipment,special tools, repair parts, inventory, and documentation from the respectiveforeign manufacturer.Commenters opposing the notice disagree with the views of the commuter/regionalairline industry on this issue. These commenters question the role andplace of commuter/regional airlines in the airline industry as a whole,and suggest that the views of these airlines be discounted. The commuter/regionalairlines are those carriers that provide regularly scheduled passengerand/or cargo service with aircraft seating less than 60 passengers andcargo payload capacity of 18,000 pounds or less. These airlines operatepursuant to schedules published in widely used airline schedule guides.The commuter/regional airline industry has shown dramatic growth duringthe years since the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978 and has been recognizedas representing a distinct class of air carriers. Today, these airlinesare an integral part of the nation's air transporation system.Because the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978 (and subsequent Civil AeronauticsBoard action) permitted communter/regional airlines to operate aircraftwith up to 60 seats and a payload capacity of up to 18,000 pounds, thesecarriers were able to operate more efficiently. This development, whichallowed carriers to match the most economical airplanes to their marketrequirements, spurred a worldwide revolution in new aircraft development.Today, a series of new generation light transport aircraft, most of themforeign manufactured, are being put into service by the commuter/regionalairlines. According to RAA, in 1986 the 179 commuter/regional airlinescarried 28.4 million passengers and the average number of passengers perairline enplaned in 1986 was 158,400. RAA states that regional airlineindustry revenue passenger miles grew to 4.47 million in 1986. The FAA recognizes this need as expressed by the regional airline industryand others for operators to be able to return warranted parts to a typecertificate holder for maintenance, not only by the adoption of the rulesrelating to Part 145 regarding foreign repair stations, but by the amendmentto andSection; 135.443 as well. Impact on Air SafetyTwo thousand and seventeen commenters express concern with an anticipatednegative impact of the proposal on air safety. Several state that theyhad firsthand experience with poor quality work performed overseas. Somespecifics relating to safety include the lack of quality control in foreignshops, work permitted to be done by unqualified people, and the lack oftools and facilities necessary to maintain aircraft effectively. Many commentersexpress an opinion that the standards of foreign repair stations are considerablyand routinely lower than the standards of U.S. domestic repair stations.The overriding concern expressed by such commenters is that work is beingdone in foreign repair stations by non-U.S.-licensed mechanics. Many commentersare concerned about work being done and approved by noncertificated supervisoryand inspection personnel as well. Because of these points, the commentersconclude that a rash of ``bogus parts'' would appear, and unauthorizedreplacement parts for use on U.S.-registered aircraft would result fromthe change under the proposal.These commenters also contend that air safety would be compromised, becausetranslation difficulties are currently being encountered when maintenancerecords are obtained on aircraft and components repaired and operated outsideof the United States. In particular, the commenters point to difficultyin obtaining adequate translations of repair records since ``some languagesdo not have technical terms which can be translated into English.'' Thesecommenters conclude that changing the foreign repair station regulationswithout a uniform language requirement for maintenance records would increasethe likelihood of inadequate records and compromise the FAA's ability toregulate and enforce its own requirements. They also state that the Noticeshould be withdrawn, because the proposals in the Notice do not includeassurances that the quality of aircraft maintenance performed by foreignrepair stations is equal to that performed by domestic repair stations.No substantive information or examples were submitted by these commentersin support of their allegations that if the proposed changes were adoptedthere would be a negative impact on air safety. The FAA has stated that if the proposals in the Notice are adopted, anequivalent level of air safety will be retained. The FAA has concludedthat these changes will not derogate safety. Foreign repair stations, whichhave been found properly qualified and certificated by the FAA and havebeen operating in accordance with FAA requirements and surveillance, havebeen providing safe and proper maintenance and alteration on U.S.-registeredaircraft and their components for almost 40 years. No substantial evidenceto the contrary has been presented by any commenter. The FAA intends thatthis safe maintenance will continue and that safety will not be adverselyaffected by the adoption of this rule. Each foreign repair station mustprove to the FAA that it fully complies with all of the requirements tobe an authorized U.S.-certificated repair station before the FAA will issueit a certificate to work on U.S.-registered aircraft. These requirementsare similar to U.S. domestic repair stations except that foreign repairstations do not require U.S.-certificated airmen in inspection and supervisorypositions. However, the FAA does review the qualifications of these airmen,even if they are certificated by the country in which the station is located,to ensure that they are able to perform, supervise, and inspect the workfor which the repair station is rated. The foreign repair station or ratingmust be renewed every 12 or 24 months in accordance with andSection; 145.17.If at any time the repair station fails to comply with the FAA requirements,its certificate can be suspended and/or revoked as has been the case inthe past. The FAA has the power of emergency suspension if the situationwarrants. When the Administrator issues a foreign repair station certificate, a findingis made that the holder is competent to perform safely the repairs forwhich it is rated. Prior to the issuance of such a certificate, a representativeof the Administrator reviews the detailed application which is requiredto be submitted, analyzes the station's proposed inspection proceduresand quality control system, examines the physical facilities of the repairstation, scrutinizes the organization and the personnel who are to performthese functions, and assesses the outside sources that the station intendsto utilize. Only after this safety review does FAA consider issuance ofa foreign repair station certificate. Thus, the certification process for a foreign repair station is substantiallythe same as the process the FAA uses for domestic repair facilities andinvolves the same standards. If a foreign repair station has been foundto be competent to repair a U.S.-registered aircraft operating wholly orpartly outside of the United States, as permitted under the current rules,then it should be equally competent to make those same repairs for aircraftoperating within the United States. When found properly qualified and certificatedby the FAA, a foreign repair station, in accordance with FAA requirementsand surveillance, can provide proper and safe maintenance and alterationon U.S._registered aircraft and their components. This amendment does notchange that fact. Under current regulations for domestic repair stations, only an individualin a supervisory or inspection category need be certificated as an airman;consequently, a person performing routine maintenance need not be an FAA-certificatedairman. However, as to supervisory and inspection personnel, both the CivilAeronautics Act of 1938 and its successor, the Federal Aviation Act of1958, as amended, specifically provide that individuals employed outsidethe United States in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhaul, orrepair of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances may, tothe extent that the Administrator may provide, be excepted from the requirementto hold an appropriate U.S. airman certificate. This statutory mandatewas recognized in the adoption of the foreign repair station regulationsin 1949. This exception, authorized by Congress, is being carried out bythe FAA. As to the contention that inadequate maintenance records are obtained fromforeign repair stations because some languages do not have technical termswhich can be translated into English, the<T3> Lexicon of Terms Used in Connection with International Civil Aviation</T3>of the International Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) provides for uniformuse of such technical terms. Also, the ICAO Standards and Recommended Practicesrequire adequate recordkeeping, regardless of the language. In a letter to the FAA, the National Safety Council (NSC) recommends thatthe FAA not amend andSection;andSection; 145.71 and 145.73. NSC is of the viewthat foreign repair stations should not provide modification, major repair,or overhaul work without inspection by U.S.-licensed personnel, unlessthe aircraft are operated wholly outside of the United States. NSC alsorefers to a contact with the U.S. Air Force Inspection and Safety Center(AFISC) who is familiar with foreign standards. According to the AFISCcontact (as related by the NSC), no AFISC personnel would agree that foreignregulatory standards are equivalent to U.S. standards, and ``* * * if foreignnationals are doing our maintenance work, we could be in trouble.'' AFISCpersonnel, as well as NSC, are apparently of the opinion that the proposalsas contained in the Notice are solely for monetary purposes and that theFAA did not consider the actual safety impact. On the other hand, the FAAis advised that the U.S. Air Force has relied heavily on foreign sourcesto repair its deployed assets for many years. Such reliance involving airframes,engines, and exchangeables increases Air Force readiness and sustainabilityby retaining these assets close to the operating locations where they wouldbe used during conflict. Moreover, the Air Force has advised that ``* ** we have found the reliability for foreign work to be comparable to U.S.work.'' FAA Surveillance Six hundred and fifty-eight commenters contend that if the proposals inthe notice are adopted, the FAA would be unable to monitor foreign repairstations effectively, due to limited inspector personnel, and compliancemonitoring and enforcement would be impossible. Among such commenters arethe Transport Workers Union (TWU) and the Aeronautical Repair Station Association(ARSA). According to TWU, the ratio of FAA inspectors to air carrier opratorshas signfiicantly decreased since deregulation. ARSA contends that thereis a serious inadequacy in the FAA's inspection and enforcement systemwhich has a direct bearing on these proposals. ARSA further states thatits members have reported that the average interval between FAA physicalplant inspections and document reviews ranges from 6 to over 36 monthswith the typical interval being 18 months. Many commenters express beliefthat the FAA is already stretched beyond its limits without incurring additionalresponsibilities. The cost to the FAA for additional inspectors is addressed by many commenters.Although Part 187 permits a charge for certification, these commenterscontend that the costs of inspector hiring, training, etc., cannot be recovered.Two aeronautical authorities, from the United Kingdom and the Federal Republicof Germany, state that they do not believe there would be any increasein applications for FAA foreign repair station certificates if the proposalsin the notice are adopted because, during the past 18 months of debateon the foreign repair station issue, there has been little or no increasein the number of organizations (repair stations that are not U.S.-certificated)expressing an interest to either government for certification. A large domestic repair station, generally supporting the notice, contendsthat it is reasonable to project a reduction in the approximately 200 existingforeign repair station certificates by the end of 1988. This commenterbases this contention on several factors: (1) The FAA appears to have implementeda general policy of reissuing Part 145 certificates for 12 months ratherthan 24 months so as to reduce the number of existing certificates; (2)it is fair to assume that the FAA will review foreign repair station certificateapplications more rigorously in the future; (3) there will be no surgein the number of foreign repair station certificates granted to organizationslocated in less-developed countries with low labor costs since the FAAwill exercise more scrutiny of a foreign repair station certificate applicationfrom a less-developed country; (4) if there are any cost advantages interms of lower wages, those labor advantages are being offset by the changein the relative value of the foreign country's currency with the dollar;and (5) an air carrier will carefully assess a number of factors priorto committing to a foreign repair station, including the continued availabilityof that facility as a source of maintenance. This commenter further contends that the certification and surveillancesystem conducted by the FAA is critical to the integrity of foreign anddomestic repair stations, as well as all entities regulated by the FAA.If there is any shortfall between the cost incurred by the FAA in surveillanceand certification of foreign repair stations and the charges assessed forthose services, immediate amendment of Part 187 to recover those costsshould be initiated. Several U.S. air carriers state that they do not believe any increase inthe number of foreign repair stations servicing airline aircraft wouldapproach the magnitude suggested by the FAA. The 50 to 100 percent increasementioned in the notice was intended only as an example. Those numberswere used to demonstrate that even for a very large percentage increase,the effects would be minimal. These commenters state that those foreignrepair agencies with a capability and capacity to service U.S.-registeredairline aircraft have already become certificated within the past 39 years,and that resources available to the FAA from the fees assessed foreignrepair station applicants are sufficient to fund the necessary personnelto provide the required inspections. In addition, these air carriers note that foreign repair stations are notonly subject to the same FAA surveillance imposed on domestic repair stations,but, in addition, all work performed for a U.S. airline by any outsiderepair agency, either domestic or foreign, must be accomplished in accordancewith the air carrier's FAA-approved maintenance operations specifications.Furthermore, the records of all work performed by such repair agenciesmust be made and maintained in accordance with the current Federal AviationRegulations. Thus, these air carriers contend, not only will the FAA performits surveillance responsibilities, but the U.S. airlines also will continueto exercise surveillance over any work performed for them by foreign repairstations.The FAA is dedicated to meeting its responsibilities under the FederalAviation Act of 1958, as amended, and will continue to do so. It is anticipatedthat by modifying these restrictions related to a determination of needand to the scope of work to be conducted by foreign repair stations, anumber of noncertificated foreign facilities can apply for FAA certification.This could have some impact on FAA certification and surveillance resources.It is difficult to anticipate the increase in foreign repair stations thatmight result from this amendment; however, based upon the domestic experience,the resource impact should be minimal. The FAA will respond to any increasedworkload.There are approximately 900 FAA inspectors now responsible for domesticrepair stations. This translates into approximately 4\1/2\ repair stationsper inspector. There are now approximately 200 foreign repair stations.If that number increased to 300 or 400, and the number of repair stationsper inspector were the same as the domestic case, it would require an increaseof 22 to 44 inspectors. Thus, even for an increase of 50 to 100 percentin the number of foreign repair stations, the increase in the number ofrequired inspectors would be less than 5 percent of the current inspectorwork force. The FAA will continue the surveillance of the existing certificatedrepair stations, domestic or foreign, and the influx of any new ones. Havingexperienced the problems associated with deregulation and an expandingindustry with a declining FAA inspection work force, the FAA has grownhighly sensitive to the need for a safety surveillance work force equalto the work demands. In addition, the certification and surveillance responsibilitiesof the FAA for foreign repair stations will make full use of informationprovided by local airworthiness authorities when appropriate, thus enhancingthe capabilities of the FAA work force. In any event, there will be noderegulation in safety because of the rule as adopted. Regarding the costsincurred by the FAA in the certification and surveilllance of foreign repairstations and the minimal fees currently assessed for those services, futurerulemaking will be conducted to review the adequacy of the fees prescribedin Part 187.FAA EnforcementSeveral commenters point out that if the proposals in the notice are adopted,the FAA could not enforce its regulations, because foreign businesses orindividuals could not be prosecuted by the U.S. Government. Although thecommenters state that the United States cannot levy civil penalties againstforeign violators, they do not provide any explanation to support thisconclusion.Under this proposal, the FAA would retain enforcement oversight over U.S.-certificatedforeign repair stations through certificate action and civil penalty action.Moreover, Pub. L. 100-223 amended section 901 of the Federal Aviation Actof 1958, as amended, to provide for a two-year civil penalty demonstrationprogram for violations of the Act or any rule or regulation issued thereunderwhich occur after December 30, 1987. Under the demonstration program, theAdministrator may assess (``order'') civil penalties not to exceed $50,000,after notice and the opportunity for hearing. This will allow FAA to adjudicatethose civil penalty actions without referring them to a U.S. attorney foradjudication in a U.S. District Court. In the case of civil penalties inexcess of $50,000, if the parties cannot reach a compromise settlement,the actions will continue to be adjudicated by referring them directlyto a U.S. attorney for adjudication in a U.S. District Court.In those instances where a respondent foreign repair station or foreignmechanic fails to pay a civil penalty (not in excess of $50,000) assessedunder the demonstration program or fails to offer and pay a compromisecivil penalty (in excess of $50,000) acceptable to the Administrator infull settlement of the alleged violations, the FAA may have difficultyin obtaining in personam jurisdiction which is necessary to pursue a collectionaction in the appropriate U.S. District Court. However, the fact that manyforeign repair stations have designated agents for purposes of servicein the United States obviates the problem. In any event, where civil penaltyactions are unsuccessful, the FAA can take certificate action and thisenforcement mechanism will be more than sufficient to ensure that safetyis maintained. The FAA has not had substantial difficulty in enforcingviolations of the FAR committed by foreign repair stations or a foreignmechanic in the past and does not foresee such difficulties in the future.Loss of JobsAmong those opposing the proposal, the majority express concern over lossof jobs in the United States and the general negative impact on the U.S.economy that would result if the proposals are adopted. Twenty-four hundredand twenty-six commenters consider the loss of jobs as the major factorin their opposition to the proposal. The magnitude of concern varies fromfear for the individual's job to ``several million'' jobs lost nationwide,including jobs in related industries. Many commenters express concern withthe potential impact on the national economy and on specific cities suchas Tulsa, Oklahoma, and Kansas City, Missouri. The Professional AviationMaintenance Association (PAMA) expresses concern that sufficient considerationwas not given by the FAA to the loss of jobs. PAMA questions the statementin the Notice that the need for maintenance service will increase in theUnited States; PAMA contends that maintenance jobs will decrease becauseproduction of general aviation aircraft has decreased by over 90 percentin the last few years. Some commenters state that the aviation industryis going the way of the steel, electronics, and textile industries: overseas.No data or analyses were included in any comment to support these claims.In contrast to the contentions of those expressing concern over loss ofjobs and negative effects on the economy, the following information hasbeen provided to the FAA. The <T3>U.S. Industrial Outlook 1988_Aerospace, </T3>U.S. Department of Commerce,January 1988 states:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * The increasing trend toward international collaboration is fosteringan escalation in trade of aircraft engines and aircraft parts, as the world'sexpanding fleet of civil and military aircraft demands more equipment formaintenance and repair * * * International collaboration in the enginesector is providing a catalyst for trade and is creating an industry whichtranscends national boundaries * * * The inflation-adjusted value of U.S.aerospace shipments is projected to climb about 3.3 percent in 1988, markingthe sixth consecutive year of industry growth. Meanwhile, U.S. aerospaceexports and imports will reach record highs of $22.1-billion and $8.8-billion,respectively. The rising trend of industrial collaboration beween U.S.and foreign manufacturers in the aircraft sector will be the chief reasonfor this increase in the flow of trade. Total industry employment is forecastto increase almost 3 percent in 1988, to 836,000.</ITAG>A study by Gellman Research Associates, Inc., Jenkintown, Pennsylvania,which was jointly sponsored by the Air Transport Association of America(ATA) and the International Air Transport Association (IATA), and includedin the ATA and IATA comments, also addresses this issue and refutes theallegation that adoption of the proposal will result in the wholesale lossof jobs in the United States. The study contends that U.S. domestic repairstations currently receive more business from foreign customers than U.S.-certificatedforeign repair stations receive from U.S. customers, and that the realthreat to U.S. jobs would be the establishment of trade barriers that couldresult in retaliation affecting both domestic repair stations and otheraerospace activities. Also, in this regard, one major U.S. manufacturersupporting the notice comments that its business as a U.S. manufacturerof a major product depends in substantial part on foeign-source business,not only for new engine buys but for follow-up repair and overhaul productsupport. This commenter points out that such reliance confirms the internationaland interdependent nature of today's aviation marketplace. If this foreignsource business is lost, which may occur if the proposals in the noticeare not adopted, this manufacturer is of the opinion that the inevitableresult would be not only a probable loss of U.S. Jobs at its overhaul andrepair facilities, but also a probable job loss on the manufacturing sideas well.Impact on National Economy and Trade Balance Several commenters express concern that foreign repair stations would havean unfair economic advantage over domestic repair stations. ARSA reportsthat of the ARSA members responding to its survey, 80 percent stated thatthey thought they would be adversely affected by having to compete withforeign-owned and subsidized firms. The FAA understands that this associationrepresents approximately 90 of the 4,400 repair stations. The number ofrepair stations responding to the ARSA survey was not stated in the ARSAcomments. ALPA states that the Notice requires foreign repair stationsto meet less stringent standards and will therefore put domestic repairstations at an economic disadvantage. Some other commenters state thatthis would be unfair competition, because some foreign countries subsidizethe work of their repair stations. They state that there is, therefore,a potential for a negative trade balance. Many commenters relate this changeto other industries that have lost jobs to foreign sources, including thesteel, automobile, and electronics industries. One commenter states thatthe domestic air transport industry employs over 100,000 skilled aircraftmechanics, and even the loss of only 10 percent of repair work in the UnitedStates means a loss of $300 million in direct wages, causing up to $600million in net loss of U.S. income. The basis for these estimates is notprovided. Several commenters referred to the FAA view expressed in the notice thatthe proposed rule changes would be consistent with the terms of severaltrade agreements to which the United States is a signatory. These commenters,in supporting the proposal, concur and stress that the proposal is in accordwith section 1102(a) of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, whichrequires the FAA to exercise and perform its powers and duties consistentlywith any obligation assumed by the United States in any agreement thatmay be enforced between the United States and any foreign country or countries.Under section 103 and Title VI of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, asamended, Congress mandated that the FAA would perform its functions onthe basis of aviation safety considerations. Congress did not delegateto FAA its power to regulate commerce with foreign nations, but ratherdirected the FAA to perform its duties and functions consistent with internationaltreaties and agreements. British Airways, as well as several other European commenters, refers torecords maintained by the Association of European Airlines (AEA) on itsmembers. It was reported that during 1986, AEA members performed approximately$34.3 dollar's worth of repair work on U.S.-registered aircraft operatedby U.S.-based operators. The $34.3-million figure and all other data containedin these records were based on information provided by 11 AEA foreign aircarrier members who accounted for over 80 percent of the repair facilitycapacity of AEA members. However, in that same year, it is stated thatthose same AEA members spent $80.9 million, more than double the amountof money spent by the U.S. operators, for repair services performed forthem by U.S. repair stations. In other words, U.S. repair stations enjoyedbetter than a two-to-one trade surplus in aircraft repair work. Furthermore,it is pointed out, that for the past 5 years, AEA figures indicate an increasingtrend in favor of U.S. repair stations. One large U.S.-certificated foreign repair station provided data showingthat its gross revenue from its aircraft engine maintenance work worldwidewas approximately $77 million in 1986 and $89 million in 1987. However,in 1986 this foreign repair station paid approximately $32 million, or42 percent, of its total maintenance revenue to various U.S. businessesretained to perform maintenance services as subcontractors and to providetools; equipment; spare parts such as turbine blades, vanes, and discs;components; and surplus supplies. The flow of such funds to the UnitedStates increased in 1987 to approximately $39 million. This foreign repairstation expects this trend to continue in the future. One foreign air carrier reports that it purchased $57 million in U.S. maintenanceservices in 1986 and performed $47 million in maintenance services forU.S. customers. Another large foreign air carrier reports that it spent$11.2 million on contract repair of its aircraft in the United States in1986 and received just over $5 million from services performed for U.S.air carriers. British Airways also points out that it is a matter of public record thatsince 1986 the value of the U.S. dollar has significantly declined relativeto the value of virtually all of the national currencies of the AEA memberairlines. As a result, British Airways believes that, compared to 1986,it would now be significantly more expensive for U.S. carriers to haverepair work performed by repair stations operated by AEA members and significantlyless expensive for AEA member carriers to utilize the services of U.S.domestic repair stations. In addition to the comments of ARSA, there were 10 domestic repair stationsthat commented on the notice. Three of these repair stations support theproposals in the notice. One such commenter states that, because the FAAis authorized to promote the development of civil aeronautics under theFederal Aviation Act, the proposals in the Notice should be promulgatedas a final rule.One commenter, although a member of PAMA, disagrees with PAMA's statedopposition that the proposals would have a negative economic and tradebalance impact. The commenter states that protectionism is a delicate art,and protectionism should be practiced by the consumer, not the government,to minimize retaliation. The commenter points out that the balance of paymentsis of concern to all U.S. citizens, but so is the ability to obtain aircraftmaintenance in a timely manner by a qualified repair station in accordancewith the Federal Aviation Regulations.Other commenters supporting the proposals as contained in the Notice provideinformation specifically on the effect of the proposals on the nationaleconomy and the balance of trade, and submit supporting data. The ATA surveyed14 of the largest ATA member airlines concerning work performed by foreignrepair stations for those U.S. airlines, as well as the work performedby those airlines for foreign operators in 1987. Responses from these airlinesindicate that approximately 104 million dollars' worth of work was performedby the U.S. air carriers for foreign operators in 1987. In contrast, approximately89 million dollars' worth of work was performed for these airlines by foreignrepair stations during the same period. Moreover, of this $89 million,approximately $11 million was not performed under the authority of theforeign repair station certificate, but was performed under the airlines'authority to contract maintenance under andSection; 121.363(b) as well asunder andSection;andSection; 121.371(a) and 121.378(a) exemption authority.ATA also points out that U.S. domestic repair stations enjoy substantialadvantages over foreign repair facilities in competing for repair workfrom U.S. air carriers in that they are located much closer to the centerof the carrier's operations. This is particularly the case when the repairstation is owned and operated by the U.S. carrier concerned.ATA also surveyed 21 large U.S. organizations that work on transport airplanesand components. All of these organizations reported to ATA that they performwork for foreign operators who are operating in the United States. Tenof these organizations reported that 30 percent or more of their work isaccomplished for foreign operators. Similarly, the results of a recentsurvey by IATA of its member airlines show an expenditure of approximately$184 million in 1987 by 20 foreign airlines for work performed by U.S.repair stations. Charts submitted by ATA and IATA set forth the use ofmaintenance by foreign operators in the United States and the resultantcreation of jobs in this country.To determine the economic impact of the proposed rulemaking on the domesticairlines, repair stations, aircraft manufacturers, and ultimately U.S.consumers, ATA and IATA jointly commissioned an economic analysis by GellmanResearch Associates, Inc. As stated above, a copy of the Gellman analysisis enclosed with both the ATA and IATA comments. ATA is of the opinionthat the Gellman analysis demonstrates that (1) The United States wouldnot benefit by restricting international trade in aircraft maintenance;(2) the aircraft maintenance business does not contain the elements (suchas economies of scale) required to provide economic benefits to a nationby restricting trade; and (3) even if an economic benefit from restrictingtrade in aircraft maintenance did accrue to repair stations, such restrictionswould result in higher costs to aircraft operators, such as airlines, whichcould translate into higher rates and fares. The Gellman report concludesthat the ultimate impact would be reduced demand for air transportationby consumers and shippers, accompanied by a reduced earnings and employmentfor airlines.Foreign commenters also submitted information to indicate that, in theiropinion, the proposal in the notice would not have a negative effect onthe U.S. national economy or on the U.S. balance of trade. As referredto above, data taken from the records of the Association of European Airlinesindicate that U.S. domestic repair stations enjoyed better than a two-to-onetrade surplus in aircraft repair work. In the opinion of British Airways,the AEA figures indicate an increasing trend in favor of U.S. repair stations.In promulgating the proposals contained in the notice, the FAA expressedthe view that the demand for maintenance services would continue to growin the United States, as well as at foreign locations, and that the effectsof the proposals in the Notice on the increase in foreign maintenance andon the existing work performed in the United States must be consideredin the context of expected overall growth in the industry. In addition,the FAA stated that, in light of these views, the proposals would not adverselyaffect either the national economy or the U.S. trade balance. The FAA encouragedcommenters to respond and submit supporting economic and trade data forany beneficial or adverse impacts that would be anticipated to occur shouldthe proposed rules be adopted. Though the views expressed by the FAA weregenerally challenged by those opposing the proposals as a whole, no supportiveeconomic or trade data were submitted by these commenters to indicate thatany adverse impact would occur should the proposed rules be adopted. Incontrast, as described above, considerable information was submitted thatsupports the initial FAA views.The U.S. Department of Commerce, as indicated in its publication, the <T3>U.S. Industrial Outlook For 1988_Aerospace</T3>, expresses the opinionthat the rising trend of industrial collaboration between U.S. and foreignmanufacturers in the aviation sector will be the chief reason that theincrease in the flow of trade may reach record highs in 1988 of $22 billionfor exports and $8.8 billion for imports. The FAA reiterates its positionthat the proposals as contained in the notice would not appear to haveany adverse impact on the national economy or trade balance.Impact of War and Terrorism/SabotageOver 60 commenters opposing the notice express the view that, with moreU.S. jobs lost to foreign facilities by enactment of the proposals, therewould be fewer qualified mechanics and maintenance facilities availableto the United States in the event of war. They also express concern thatU.S. aircraft would be more susceptible to international terrorism or sabotageactivity. No supporting data were submitted by the commenters espousingthis issue.As stated above, the FAA has been advised that the U.S. Air Force (USAF)has relied heavily on foreign sources to repair its aircraft for many yearsso that USAF readiness and sustainability can be increased by retainingits aircraft close to operating locations where the aircraft would be usedduring conflict.In the nearly 40 years since U.S.-registered aircraft have been utilizingforeign repair stations, the threat of war or terrorism/sabotage has notbeen a problem; there is no reason to believe the amendments adopted inthis rule would change that.DrugsSeveral commenters express concern over the use of illegal substances bypersonnel overseas. The commenters state that drug use is checked in theUnited States by the growing practice of testing for illegal substances,which may not be the case at foreign repair stations. Testing for druguse in the aviation industry is a matter of growing importance. The FAAhas initiated other regulatory actions in this area. Therefore, the commenters'concerns are outside the scope of this rulemaking.Exemption ProcessOver 15 commenters opposing NPRM No. 87-12 point out that the proposedrule is not necessary, because exemptions currently permit certain workto be performed overseas by foreign repair stations.The FAA has handled over 100 exemption actions from petitions filed byU.S. air carriers for relief from the operating Parts of the regulations(Parts 121 and 135) to permit these carriers to use foreign repair facilitiesthat otherwise would not be available under current regulations. Exemptionswere granted to air carriers who operate foreign-manufactured aircraftand/or foreign-manufactured components installed on U.S.-registered aircraft,and have limited access to qualified repair and overhaul facilities inthe United States. As an example, one U.S. air carrier commenting on theNotice points out that it uses a foreign-manufactured air compressor, andthere is no U.S. domestic repair station authorized or equipped to overhauland repair such a unit. The FAA has found that allowing such carriers toutilize experienced type certificate holders and U.S.-certificated foreignrepair facilities with trained personnel, who are qualified to performwork on original foreign-manufactured component parts, provides a levelof safety equal to that provided by the rules from which the exemptionshave been sought. While the FAA has granted exemptions to U.S. air carriersin these cases, that mechanism does not provide a solution to all of theproblems brought about by the increasingly international character of U.S.air carrier operations. As stated by one U.S. air carrier, the exemptionprocess not only increases the workload of an already heavily burdenedFAA staff, it poses serious problems for carriers requiring prompt maintenance.The unavoidable delay caused by the need to prepare, file, and obtain anexemption can be a serious problem for a carrier that faces unexpectedmaintenance problems. Furthermore, the exemption process is not only timeconsuming and burdensome for the petitioner, but is intended to cover onlyunique problems of a person, rather than classes of problems.Bogus PartsOver 75 commenters oppose the proposal contained in the Notice contendingthat there would be increased use of unauthorized or ``bogus'' parts andcomponents on U.S.-registered aircraft if the proposals are adopted. TheInternational Association of Machinists (IAM) refers to the large amountof foreign parts not maintained according to FAA specifications that werefound during the National Air Transportation Inspections (NATI) and theinvestigation of the crash of an Arrow Air DC-8. Other than IAM's reference,no supporting documentation was submitted on this issue.The problems encountered during the NATI program are complex, involvingrepair station authority and surveillance issues. Some of the problemsassociated with repair station authority are addressed by this rulemakingin that what are currently considered to be ``unauthorized'' parts areso, simply because of the existing restrictive scope of work that can beaccomplished by foreign repair stations. The problems associated with surveillancehave been addressed by the FAA and will continue to be closely monitored.Dissolution of U.S. Air Carrier Maintenance OperationsOver 45 commenters that oppose NPRM No. 87-12 express concern that airlinemanagement, in supporting amendment of Part 145 in regard to foreign repairstations, is looking only at maintenance costs, not quality, and that airlinemanagement would be quick to move all of their airline overhaul facilitiesout of the country. These commenters contend that if the proposals areadopted U.S. air carriers would completely dissolve portions of their maintenanceoperations and send all component and aircraft work overseas. No substantivedata were presented to support the above contention.The FAA place full maintenance responsibility on the operator. Airlinecomments supporting the proposal point out that U.S. carriers have, andwill continue to have, the overwhelming portion of all maintenance workperformed in the United States. This is borne out by U.S. airline testimonybefore Congress on the use of foreign repair stations by U.S.airlines (<T3>Hearing Before the Aviation Subcommittee of the House Committee onPublic Works and Transportation,</T3> 100th Congress, First Session, July28, 1987, pages 59, 92, and 362). ATA's comments supporting this noticepoint out that there is more to consider in the cost of maintenance thanthe cost of the labor, such as overhead, depreciation of sophisticatedequipment, inventory costs, shop capacity, delays in shipment to aircraftor components to foreign shops, and the availability of skilled labor toperform the maintenance. ATA takes the position that the United Statesis well in the lead in these areas.RAA, in supporting the proposals in the notice, states that U.S. regionalairlines do not, as a rule, operate revenue flights outside of the UnitedStates. Thus, regional airlines do not rely heavily on foreign repair stationsto do work that could be done in this country. On the other hand, RAA pointsout that regional airlines are impacted by FAA rules that prevent suchair carriers from sending aircraft and components to the original manufacturerfor repair or overhaul to ensure that the manufacturer remains accountablefor the quality of the product.Evidence and arguments submitted by the commenters forwarding informationsupport the conclusion that U.S. airlines prefer to maintain their aircraftat domestic locations.The FAA does not concur with the contention that, if the proposals areadopted, there will be an exodus of U.S. air carrier maintenance operationsoverseas.Foreign RetaliationSeveral commenters supporting the notice point out that failure of theUnited States to adopt the proposed amendments may be viewed by foreigngovernments as an overly protectionist act by the U.S. Government and,under these circumstances, it would be reasonable to assume that if theproposed amendments are not adopted, there would be intense pressures onforeign governments to impose reciprocal restrictions on the use of U.S.repair stations by their national flag carriers. Furthermore, the commentersstate that the demand for reciprocal restrictions could easily expand toinclude other aviation products and services, such as a product manufacturedby both domestic and foreign entities.Aeronautical authorities of the British and German governments (CAA andLBA) remind the FAA in their comments that their governments permit U.S.domestic repair stations unrestricted access to their aviation industry,subject only to the need for current release documentation and records.Any significant difference between the intent of the final rule and theintent of the notice would be assumed by these governments to be causedby concern for safety standards. They, in turn, would be required to reviewtheir own acceptance standards from any foreign source, including U.S.domestic repair stations. The aeronautical authority of the French government(DGAC) states that they are planning to review their regulations relatedto DGAC certification of foreign repair stations (e.g., U.S. domestic repairstations) under the same technical requirements as French repair stationsexcept in cases where, due to maintenance arrangements or bilateral agreementsbetween authorities, it will be reciprocally recognized that the approvalsgiven by one authority are considered valid by the other.Other supporters of the proposals also point out that no major foreigngovernment currently imposes any regulatory restrictions on the use ofFAA-certificated U.S. repair facilities by its own airlines. These commentersrefer repeatedly to testimony at the Congressional hearing on the use offoreign repair stations by U.S. airlines in July 1987 (Hearing before theAviation Subcommittee of the House Committee on Public Works and Transportation).Mr. Crawford F. Brubaker, the Deputy Assistant Secretary of Commerce forthe United States, testified at this hearing that many foreign governmentshad informed him that retaining existing geographic restrictions on foreignrepair stations is inconsistent with the Agreement on Trade in Civil Aircraftwhich was negotiated pursuant to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade(GATT). In his testimony, Mr. Brubaker stated (page 8):<ITAG tagnum="21">However, if, in the view of our foreign trading partners this issueis not resolved in a prompt and fair manner, there is a possibility thata dispute action [GATT] might be filed by one or more signatories. Shouldany trading partner take counteraction, it could be detrimental to bothour airlines and to our aircraft industry.</ITAG>At this same hearing, Pratt andamp; Whitney testimony (page 103) and BoeingCo. testimony (page 101) were to the effect that if foreign governmentswere to adopt regulations that narrowed their current foreign repair restrictions,the U.S. aviation maintenance industry would suffer a substantial lossof business. The Aerospace Industries Association of America declared that(pages 98 and 99):<ITAG tagnum="21">Any regulation that would restrict the free flow of trade in the internationalairline market would ultimately have a negative impact on the U.S. aerospaceindustry and the Nation's overall trade balance. Last year, the industryemployed 1.3 million people. Loss of competitiveness in the world marketcould lead to a catastrophic loss of American jobs in this vital manufacturingsector.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">* * * Further, the imposition of trade restrictions is clearly notwithin FAA's purview and should be left to international negotiation. Theuse of FAA's regulations for protectionism will give rise to reciprocalactions from foreign airworthiness agencies and will undermine the FAA'sworldwide credibility in safety.</ITAG>Commenters raising this issue conclude the foreign retaliation could wellresult in reduced business by domestic repair stations. These commentersalso contend that domestic airframe, engine, electronics, and equipmentmanufacturers could be targeted for retaliatory measures resulting in highercosts to their businesses, reduced demand for their products, and ultimatelyreduced earnings and employment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>Information collection requirements in the proposed amendments to andSection;135.443 have previously been approved by the Office of Management and Budget(OMB) under the provisions of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (Pub.L. 96-511) and have been assigned OMB Control Number 2120-0039.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Evaluation</ITAG>In promulgating the proposals contained in the notice, the FAA expressedthe view that the demand for maintenance services will continue to growin the United States as well as at foreign locations. The effects of theproposals in the notice on the increase in foreign maintenance and on theexisting work performed in the United States must be considered in thecontext of expected overall growth in the industry. In addition, the FAAstated that the proposals would not adversely affect either the nationaleconomy or the U.S. trade balance. The FAA further concluded that therewould not be a large shift of jobs from the United States to foreign countries.In light of the above views, the FAA encouraged commenters to respond andsubmit supporting factual economic and trade data for any anticipated beneficalor adverse impacts should the proposed rules be adopted. The FAA also solicitedrecommendations for better methods to achieve the objectives of the rulesand rule changes proposed in the Notice. Though the views by the FAA werestrongly challenged by those opposing the proposals as a whole, no supportivefactual economic or trade information was submitted by these commentersto indicate how an adverse impact would occur to the national economy ortrade balance should the proposed rules be adopted; nor were any recommendationssubmitted by these commenters for achieving the objectives of the rules.These commenters desire to retain the status quo and maintain the foreignrepair station regulations adopted in 1949 as they are now set forth inPart 145.Those opposed to the proposals contained in the notice express concernthat foreign repair stations would have an unfair economic advantage overdomestic repair stations. These commenters allege foreign repair stationswould have to meet less stringent standards than domestic repair stationsand that domestic repair stations would be placed at an economic disadvantage.One unsubstantiated statement alleges that if the proposals are adopted,there would be a net loss in U.S. income of up to $600 million. The basisfor these estimates is not provided. An association of repair stationsreported that, of its members responding to a survey sent out by the association,80 percent stated that they thought they would be adversely affected byhaving to compete with foreign-owned and subsidized firms. No supportingdata were submitted by this association, even as to the number of repairstations the association represented, or the number of repair stationsresponding to the survey. The FAA understands that this association representsapproximately 90 of the 4,400 repair stations.The primary concern expressed in most of the opposing comments is relatedto the loss of jobs in the United States and the general negative impacton the U.S. economy that would result if the proposals are adopted. A widerange of estimates for lost jobs is offered; however, there is no explanationof how these estimates were made. In general, no data or analyses wereincluded in any comment to support these claims.As detailed in the <T3>Discussion of Comments</T3> section, commenters supporting the proposalssubmitted extensive and factual information indicating that foreign entitiescurrently spend up to twice as much in the United States for maintenanceas U.S. operators spend abroad. These commenters contend that this trendwill continue, because there will not be a dramatic increase in the numberof new foreign repair stations. Furthermore, there are a limited numberof facilities in the world that can meet the FAA's stringent requirements.The expectation that trade will not be adversely affected is supportedby the U.S. Department of Commerce that concludes the rising trend of industrialcollaborating between U.S. and foreign manufacturers in the aviation sectorwill increase the expected flow of trade for 1988 to record highs. TheU.S. Department of Commerce cited figures of $22 billion for exports and$8.8 billion for imports in the aviation sector. This trend towards internationalcollaboration in aircraft manufacturing will also result in the growthof trade in equipment for maintenance and repair, and consequently reciprocalgrowth in the trade of repair services. This expected expansion supportsthe FAA view that overall growth in the aviation industry will offset losses,if any, in maintenance and services.Supporters of the proposals refute the allegations that the rules wouldcreate an exodus of jobs from the United States to foreign countries, contendingthat the allegations are unsupported. As pointed out by such supportersin the <T3>Discussion of Comments</T3> section, there will not be a wholesaleuse of foreign repair stations by U.S. operators. Also, the U.S. Departmentof Commerce points out that the world's expanding fleet of aircraft willdemand more equipment for maintenance and repair, and the total industryemployment for 1988 in the overall aviation sector is forecast to increaseby almost 3 percent.Additionally, as pointed out in the <T3>Discussion of Comments</T3> section, if the foreign repair stationrules are not updated and adopted as proposed, and if the United Statesretains the status quo and adopts a stance of protectionism, there aresufficient indicators regarding the likelihood of some retaliatory actionfrom some foreign governments to adjust their regulations, making themas restrictive as those currently in effect in Part 145. These actionscould very well result in a negative impact on the U.S. economy. This possibilityis supported by the fact that the U.S. Department of Commerce has beenadvised by many foreign governments that, in their opinion, retention ofexisting geographic restrictions on foreign repair stations by the UnitedStates is inconsistent with certain international treaties to which theUnited States is a signatory. These foreign governments have further statedthat if they were to take counteraction, it could be detrimental to bothU.S. airlines and to the U.S. aircraft industry.Although expanding access to world markets for aircraft maintenance couldresult in additional work being done at foreign locations, the FAA mustconclude from the information submitted to this docket (Docket No. 25454)that the consequences would not inlcude a major, if any, shift in jobs.Nor, will adoption of these rules have an adverse impact on the nationaleconomy or on the U.S. balance of trade. The <T3>Discussion of Comments </T3>section points out that the rules willbe beneficial, particularly to U.S. air carriers and to manufacturers (aswell as to some domestic repair stations) in their ability to obtain maintenanceand repair work on foreign-manufactured aircraft and components. Further,it should also be noted that there are no direct compliance costs to U.S.interests associated with the foreign repair station revisions, becausecertification as a repair station is strictly voluntary. A loss of somejobs could certainly be possible, if only as a normal effect of any competition;however, the supporting information in the docket does not show that sucha major loss would occur. Though the rule could be restricted solely to foreign manufacturers, thisrestriction would not fully address many U.S. air carrier problems, particularlyin cases where there is no domestic facility capable of performing certainnecessary maintenance. Likewise, limiting the scope of work only to warranteditems will not cover a situation in which no U.S. domestic repair stationis authorized or equipped to overhaul and repair a certain component notcovered by warranty. The airline industry has experienced rapid growth following deregulationresulting in a demand for equipment suitable to the individual operator'srequirements. This demand has been increasingly met through internationalendeavors in the manufacture of aircraft and their components. The demandfor qualified maintenance services and facilities has grown as the fleetof foreign-manufactured aircraft has increased, particularly in the regionaland commuter airline industry. Many U.S. operators have not invested the capital required to provide domesticmaintenance facilities that are capable of servicing foreign-manufacturedaircraft, nor have they been able to attract outside repair facilitiesto provide the necessary services. Under the existing regulations, somecarriers that operate foreign-manufactured aircraft have obtained exemptionsto take advantage of the manufacturer's warranty provisions for the productsthey operate. Presently, some manufacturers are precluded from repairingtheir own products, because of their repair station's location or theirinability to obtain U.S. certification under andSection;andSection; 145.71and 145.73. While the FAA has granted exemptions to U.S. air carriers to permit themo use foreign repair facilities that would not be othewise available undercurrent regulations, that mechanism does not provide a solution to allof the problems brought about by the increasingly international characterof U.S. air carrier operations. The exemption process is time consumingand by its very nature places a repeated and continued burden on a petitioner.It does not take care of unforeseen maintenance needs and is only intendedto cover unique problems of an individual person, rather than classes ofproblems, such as the matter of foreign repair stations. Also, in lightof the lengthy negotiation process associated with formulating and refiningbilateral agreements, pursuing additional bilateral agreements for maintenanceof U.S.-registered aircraft is not considered advantageous in terms ofany short-term benefits for the U.S. aviation community. The FAA has determined that allowing domestic and foreign manufacturersholding U.S. repair station certificates to contract the repair of componentsto non-U.S.-certificated repair stations, domestic and foreign, under thespecific circumstances set forth in the amended andSection; 145.47(c) willnot diminish the quality of the repairs, as the components would be approvedfor return to service under the repair station's quality control processthat has been found acceptable to the FAA. This new process will increasethe amount of maintenance resources available to U.S. operators, therebyreducing costs and delays associated with their operations. The amendment to andSection; 135.443(b), which permits a foreign repair stationto return an aircraft or part to service after performance of maintenance,similar to existing andSection; 121.709(b), should not result in any adverseimpact. Because the implementation of andSection; 121.709(b) has not createdany problems, none are anticipated from the change to Part 135. Further,being able to use a foreign repair station to return their aircraft toservice would be a major benefit for Part 135 operators. <ITAG tagnum="84">International Trade Impact Analysis </ITAG>As set forth in the <T3>Discussion of Comments </T3>section, the amendments contained hereinare consistent with the terms of several trade agreements to which theUnited States is a signatory, such as the Trade Agreements Act of 1979(19 U.S.C. 2501 <T3>et seq.</T3>), incorporating the Agreement on Trade in Civil Aircraft(31 U.S.T. 619), and the Agreement on Technical Barriers to Trade (Standards)(19 U.S.C. 2531). Not only do these changes reflect the FAA's desire toeliminate unnecessary barriers to international trade, but such actionis consistent with section 1102(a) of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958,as amended, which requires the FAA to exercise and perform its powers andduties consistently with any obligation assumed by the United States inany agreement that may be in force between the United States and any foreigncountry or countries. The economic trade impacts are discussed in the previoussection (<T3>Regulatory Evaluation</T3>). <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Determination </ITAG>The Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) of 1980 was enacted by Congress toensure that small entitities are not unnecessarily and disproportionatelyburdened by government regulations. The RFA requires agencies to reviewrules which may have ``a significant impact on a substantial number ofsmall entities.''The FAA has determined that these amendments are not expected to have asignificant impact on a substantial number of small entities. The provisionsof this rule are primarily directed toward the activities of foreign repairstations and, therefore, domestic repair stations are not expected to incurany costs for compliance. Consequently, the domestic repair stations shouldnot incur any significant economic impact under FAA Order 2100.14A, September16, 1986, Regulatory Flexibility Criteria and Guidance. Furthermore, bydeleting barriers in the aviation repair station industry and encouragingpotential entrepreneurs to introduce beneficial products and processesto the aviation industry as a whole, the amendments are consistent withthe Act (see RFA sec. 2(a)(5)). This is supported by comments receivedon the notice. Of the 10 domestic repair stations that commented individually, 5 indicatethat they are large repair stations and not small entities; no indicationwas given as to the size of the other 5 repair stations. The bulk of thosecommenters opposing the notice are individual employees of large entities,particularly large airlines. The majority of the 4,400 domestic repairstations are small entities (businesses with less than 200 employees).These small domestic repair stations are primarily concerned with the smallergeneral aviation U.S.-registered aircraft and components and are not impactedby an increase or decrease in the number of foreign repair stations. Therefore,the FAA has determined that the amendments are not expected to have a significantimpact on a substantial number of small entities and has concluded thata regulatory flexibility analysis is not required. <ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Implications </ITAG>The regulations set forth in these amendments are promulgated pursuantto authority in the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended (49 U.S.C.1301, <T3>et seq.</T3>), which statute is construed to preempt State law regulatingthe same subject. Thus, in accordance with Executive Order 12612, it isdetermined that such regulations do not have federalism implications warrantingthe preparation of a Federalism Assessment. <ITAG tagnum="84">Conclusion </ITAG>For the reasons discussed in the preamble and based on the findings inthe Regulatory Flexibility Determination and the International Trade ImpactAnalysis, the FAA has determined that this final rule is not major underExecutive Order 12291, and that this rule will not have a significant economicimpact, positive or negative, on a substantial number of small entitiesunder the criteria of the Regulatory Flexibility Act. This proposal isconsidered significant under DOT Regulatory Policies and Procedures (44FR 11034; February 26, 1979). The regulatory evaluation of this final rule,including a Regulatory Flexibility Determination and Trade Impact Analysis,is printed in its entirety in this final rule and has been placed in theregulatory docket. A copy may be obtained by contacting the person identifiedunder ``<T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT</T2>.'' <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>14 CFR Part 135 Air carriers, Air taxis, Aircraft, Airmen, Aviation safety, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements. 14 CFR Part 145 Aircraft, Airworthiness, Aviation safety, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">The Rule </ITAG>In consideration of the foregoing, the Federal Aviation Administrationamends Parts 135 and 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations (14 CFR Parts135 and 145) as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 135_AIR TAXI OPERATORS AND COMMERCIAL OPERATORS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 135 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>49 U.S.C. 1354(a), 1355(a), 1421 through 1431, and1502; 49 U.S.C. 106(g) (Revised Pub. L. 97-449, January 12, 1983). </ITAG>2. By amending andSection;135.443(b) by adding a flush paragraph followingandSection;135.443(b)(3) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;135.443 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Airworthiness release or aircraft maintenance log entry. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (3) * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(3) of this section, after maintenance,preventive maintenance, or alterations performed by a repair station certificatedunder the provisions of Subpart C of Part 145, the airworthiness releaseor log entry required by paragraph (a) of this section may be signed bya person authorized by that repair station. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 145_REPAIR STATIONS </ITAG>3. The authority citation for Part 145 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 313, 314, 601, and 607, 72 Stat. 752; 49 U.S.C.1354(a), 1355, 1421, and 1427, unless otherwise noted. </ITAG>4. By amending andSection;145.47 by redesignating paragraph (c) as (d) andadding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;145.47 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Equipment and materials: Ratings other than limited ratings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) A certificated domestic or foreign repair station may contract maintenanceand alteration of components of a type certificated product to a noncertificatedsource identified in the repair station's inspection procedures manualprovided: (1) The repair station is the manufacturer who originally manufacturedthe product for which it holds a U.S. type certificate; (2) The contracted component is included as part of the type certificatedproduct; (3) The component maintenance is done by the original component manufactureror its manufacturing licensee; and (4) Before such a component is returned to service, the repair stationensures that it is being returned to service in accordance with the repairstation's quality control system as approved by the Administrator and setforth in the repair station's operations specifications and inspectionprocedures manual. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>5. By revising andSection;145.71 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;145.71 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements. </ITAG>A repair station certificate with appropriate ratings may be issued fora foreign repair station if the Administrator determines that it will benecessary for maintaining or altering United States registered aircraftand aircraft engines, propellers, appliances, and component parts thereoffor use on United States registered aircraft. A foreign repair stationmust meet the requirements for a domestic repair station certificate, exceptthose in andSection;andSection;145.39 through 145.43. 6. By revising andSection;145.73 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;145.73 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of work authorized. </ITAG>(a) A certificated foreign repair station may, with respect to United Statesregistered aircraft, maintain or alter aircraft, airframes, powerplants,propellers, or component parts thereof. The Administrator may prescribeoperations specifications containing limitations that the Administratordetermines necessary to comply with the airworthiness requirements of thischapter. (b) A certificated foreign repair station may perform only the specificservices and functions within the ratings and classes that are stated inits operations specifications. <ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC, on November 16, 1988 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">T. Allan McArtor, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-26934 Filed 11-17-88; 12:28 pm] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-13-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>